trunk/apertium-eu-en/apertium-eu-en.en.metadix
    <pardef n="f/oot__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oot</l>
          <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e c="CP: add -eet (noun with irregular plural)">
        <p>
          <l>eet</l>
          <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="CP: alternative plural form, not very frequent (same form as singular)">
        <p>
          <l>oot</l>
          <r>oot<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="br/other__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>other</l>
          <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR" c="CP: add -ethren (alternative plural form; irregular)">
        <p>
          <l>ethren</l>
          <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e c="CP: add -others (regular plural form)">
        <p>
          <l>others</l>
          <r>other<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stimul/us__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remove -us and add -i (normally applied to words of Latin origin), or remain the same (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="larva__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which add -e (normally applied to words of Latin origin), or -s (LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ind/ex__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remove -ex and add -exes or -ices (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>ex</l>
          <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>exes</l>
          <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ices</l>
          <r>ex<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="appendi/x__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remove -x and add -ces or -xes (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>x</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>xes</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="criteri/on__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remove -on and add -a or -ons(LR)">
        <p>
          <l>on</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ons</l>
          <r>on<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ox__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which add -en">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="quiz__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which add -zes">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zes</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>zes'</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><j/>'s<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="schema__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which add -s or -ta (LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ta</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gen/us__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns that remove -us and add -era or -uses (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>us</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>era</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>uses</l>
          <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tableau__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which add -x (some nouns of French origin)or -s (USA; LR)">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>x</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ooth__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ooth</l>
          <r>ooth<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e c="CP: add -eeth (noun with irregular plural)">
        <p>
          <l>eeth</l>
          <r>ooth<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/oose__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oose</l>
          <r>oose<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e c="CP: add -eese (noun with irregular plural)">
        <p>
          <l>eese</l>
          <r>oose<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dilettant/e__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -e and add -i or -es (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kibbutz__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which add -im">
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>im</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="librett/o__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -o and add -i or -os (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="lir/a__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -a and add -e">
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pen/ny__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -ny and add -ce or -nies (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>ny</l>
          <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ce</l>
          <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>nies</l>
          <r>ny<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="phalan/x__n">
      <e c="CP: nouns which remove -x and add -ges or -xes (LR)">
        <p>
          <l>x</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ges</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>xes</l>
          <r>x<s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="annex"><i>ann</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="appendix"><i>appendi</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="eucalyptus" r="LR"><i>eucalypt</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="beau"><i>beau</i><par n="tableau__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="brother"><i>br</i><par n="br/other__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="bureau" a="doriua"><i>bureau</i><par n="tableau__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="complex"><i>compl</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="concerto" a="carmentano"><i>concert</i><par n="librett/o__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="criterion"><i>criteri</i><par n="criteri/on__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="crucifix"><i>crucifi</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="foot"><i>f</i><par n="f/oot__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="genius" a="carmentano"><i>geni</i><par n="stimul/us__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="index"><i>ind</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="larva"><i>larva</i><par n="larva__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="matrix" a="carmentano"><i>matri</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="placenta"><i>placenta</i><par n="larva__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pontifex"><i>pontif</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="prefix"><i>prefi</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="retina"><i>retina</i><par n="larva__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="stigma"><i>stigma</i><par n="schema__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="suffix"><i>suffi</i><par n="appendi/x__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="tooth"><i>t</i><par n="t/ooth__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="trauma"><i>trauma</i><par n="schema__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="trousseau"><i>trousseau</i><par n="tableau__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="vagina"><i>vagina</i><par n="larva__n"/>    </e>
    <e lm="amoeba"><i>amoeba</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="apex"><i>ap</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="catena"><i>catena</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="codex"><i>cod</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="curia"><i>curia</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="decidua"><i>decidua</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="diastema"><i>diastema</i><par n="schema__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="empyema"><i>empyema</i><par n="schema__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="fibroma"><i>fibroma</i><par n="schema__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="glabella"><i>glabella</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="melisma"><i>melisma</i><par n="schema__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="morula"><i>morula</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="myxoma"><i>myxoma</i><par n="schema__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="narthex"><i>narth</i><par n="ind/ex__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="nebula"><i>nebula</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="penny"><i>pen</i><par n="pen/ny__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="petechia"><i>petechia</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="pheocromocytoma"><i>pheocromocytoma</i><par n="schema__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="plateau"><i>plateau</i><par n="tableau__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="pupa"><i>pupa</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="radula"><i>radula</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="retinoblastoma"><i>retinoblastoma</i><par n="schema__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="stoma"><i>stoma</i><par n="schema__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="stroma"><i>stroma</i><par n="schema__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="synaloepha"><i>synaloepha</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="syntagma"><i>syntagma</i><par n="schema__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="taenia"><i>taenia</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="tarantula"><i>tarantula</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="teratoma"><i>teratoma</i><par n="schema__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="tibia"><i>tibia</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="trabecula"><i>trabecula</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="trachoma"><i>trachoma</i><par n="schema__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="urethra"><i>urethra</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="uvula"><i>uvula</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="vertebra"><i>vertebra</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
    <e lm="vulva"><i>vulva</i><par n="larva__n"/>     </e>
